src/fst/affixes/VTA_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_S_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igodogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igoon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aabanen # ;
